Washington statutes.
RCW 38.40.120

Authorized military organizations.

No organized body other than the recognized militia organizations of this state, armed forces of the United States, students of educational institutions where military science is a prescribed part of the course of instruction or bona fide veterans organizations shall associate themselves together as a military company or organize or parade in public with firearms: PROVIDED, That nothing herein shall be construed to prevent authorized parades by the organized militia of another state or armed forces of foreign countries. Any person participating in any such unauthorized organization shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 1989 c 19 s 53; 1943 c 130 s 54; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8603-54. Prior: 1909 c 249 s 294; 1903 c 135 s 1.]